zh-CN: 卡车安装孔位图: 新派; 老派; 通用; 其他
da: Monteringshulmønster for trucks: New school; Old school; Universelt; Andet
fr: Schéma de perçage pour la fixation des trucks: New school; Old school; Universel; Autre
pt-PT: Padrão de orifícios de montagem dos eixos: New school; Old school; Universal; Outro
fi: Trukin kiinnitysreikien kuvio: New school; Old school; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
cs: Schéma montážních otvorů pro truck: New school; Old school; Univerzální; Ostatní
pt-BR: Truck padrão de furos de montagem: New school; Old school; Universal; Outro
tr: Kamyon montaj deliği deseni: Yeni nesil; Eski nesil; Evrensel; Diğer
sk-SK: Schéma montážnych otvorov pre nákladné vozidlo: Nová škola; Stará škola; Univerzálny; Iné
th: รูปแบบรูยึดสำหรับรถบรรทุก: รุ่นใหม่; รุ่นเก่า; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Sunkvežimio tvirtinimo skylių schema: „New school“; „Old school“; Universalus; Kita
es: Patrón de orificios de montaje del camión: Nueva escuela; Vieja escuela; Universal; Otro
sv: Hålmönster för truckmontering: New school; Old school; Universell; Annat
hu: Teherautó felfüggesztésének rögzítőfurat-mintázata: New school; Old school; Univerzális; Egyéb
ro-RO: Modelul găurilor de montare a axului: New school; Old school; Universal; Altele
vi: Mẫu lỗ lắp đặt trên xe tải: New school; Old school; Phổ thông; Khác
zh-TW: 輪架安裝孔樣式: 新式; 舊式; 通用; 其他
hr-HR: Raspored rupa za montažu kamiona: Novi stil (New school); Stari stil (Old school); Univerzalno; Ostalo
ja: トラック取り付け穴パターン: ニュースクール; オールドスクール; ユニバーサル; その他
en: Truck mounting hole pattern: New school; Old school; Universal; Other
it: Schema dei fori di fissaggio del truck: New school; Old school; Universale; Altro
nb: Hullmønster for lastebilmontering: New school; Old school; Universell; Annet
ru: Схема монтажных отверстий траков: New school; Old school; Универсальный; Другое
pl: Układ otworów montażowych trucków: New school; Old school; Uniwersalny; Inne
de: Befestigungslochmuster der Achsen: New School; Old School; Universal; Sonstiges
el: Μοτίβο οπών στερέωσης αξόνων: New school; Old school; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
nl: Truck montagegatpatroon: New school; Old school; Universeel; Anders
ko: 트럭 장착 홀 패턴: 뉴스쿨; 올드스쿨; 범용; 기타
sl-SI: Vzorec montažnih lukenj podvozja: New school; Old school; Univerzalno; Drugo
bg-BG: Схема на монтажните отвори на скейтборд осите: New school; Old school; Универсален; Друго